Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [1.60] DELEGATE SELECTION; CONSTITUTIONAL CONVENTION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Constitutional convention delegate appointment. new text end new text begin The state must send five delegates to a convention called by Congress under Article V of the United States Constitution. One delegate each must be appointed by the senate majority leader, the senate minority leader, the speaker of the house, and the minority leader of the house of representatives. The four appointing authorities must appoint a fifth delegate by unanimous choice. If the appointing authorities are unable to select a fifth delegate unanimously by the deadline for appointment, the state will send four delegates to the convention. The selection process shall be used for any convention called under the authority of Article V of the United States Constitution. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Alternate delegates. new text end new text begin Each appointing authority may appoint one alternate delegate to serve in the event that the delegate appointed by that appointing authority is unable to perform delegate responsibilities. The four appointing authorities may unanimously appoint one alternate to serve in the event the fifth delegate appointed unanimously by the four appointing authorities is unable to perform delegate responsibilities. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Appointment deadline. new text end new text begin The delegates and alternates must be appointed no later than 30 days prior to the date that Congress calls a convention for proposing amendments or no later than 30 days prior to a time limit set by Congress, whichever is earlier. new text end